Illinois, session 104th, SB2201.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 3-2-15 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-15 new)7    Sec. 3-2-15. Department of Corrections; report of 8contraband. The Department of Corrections shall annually 9collect and publish on its website the following data:10        (1) contraband-related data:11            (A) identified by facility;12            (B) identified by the place in the facility where 13        the contraband was found, including, but not limited 14        to, cell, visiting room, common areas, or correctional 15        employee dining facility;16            (C) any method of entrance to the facility, 17        including, but not limited to, correctional employee 18        entrance, visitor entrance, vendor entrance, delivery 19        person entrance, mail delivery, attorney visit, and 20        other entrances to the facility;21            (D) searches of persons and vehicles entering the 22        facility; 23            (E) type of contraband:   SB2201 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06494 RLC 20273 b1                (i) drugs: specified by type or kind: 2                    (I) item tested;3                    (II) test used; and4                    (III) test results (positive, negative, 5                inconclusive, or unknown); 6                (ii) phones;7                (iii) weapons; and8                (iv) other contraband; 9            (F) number of instances or individuals caught 10        possessing or attempting to procure or possess 11        contraband:12                (i) by facility; and13                (ii) by designation of person within the 14            facility such as staff or committed person; and15            (G) number of referrals for prosecution for 16        contraband brought into a correctional facility by 17        staff and individuals in custody. Data shall be 18        presented as a statewide aggregate and shall not 19        identify any particular facility, county, or locality; 20        (2) substance use disorder treatment or educational 21    programming data by facility:22            (A) available treatment programs indicating level 23        of treatment: substance used education or intensive 24        services;25            (B) number of participants; and26            (C) number of committed persons on waitlist;  SB2201 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06494 RLC 20273 b1        (3) data regarding the use of naloxone by correctional 2    employees and committed persons, excluding persons who 3    administered the naloxone;4        (4) data regarding emergency medical response and 5    hospitalizations of individuals in custody:6            (A) by facility;7            (B) for what reason, including, for example, 8        suspected drug overdose or exposure, injury inflicted 9        by another person, environmental or workplace injury, 10        or other; and11            (C) by outcome:12                (i) off-site emergency room visit;13                (ii) off-site medical furlough;14                (iii) total number of individuals in custody 15            housed in outside hospitals;16                (iv) total number of days individuals are 17            housed in outside hospitals; and18        (5) data regarding emergency medical response and 19    hospitalizations of staff: 20            (A) by facility; and21            (B) for what reason, including, for example, 22        suspected drug overdose or exposure, injury inflicted 23        by another person, environmental or workplace injury, 24        or other. 25    The data described in paragraph (1) and subparagraph (A) 26of paragraphs (4) and (5) shall be collected beginning July 1,   SB2201 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06494 RLC 20273 b12026 and shall be published annually on or before August 1 of 2each year. All other data described in paragraphs (2) through 3(5) shall be collected beginning July 1, 2027 and shall be 4published annually on or before August 1 of each year. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 62026.